District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.52

Registration.

(a)

Except as provided in § 3-1207.54 and subsection (d) of this section, a person shall not engage in practice as a pharmacy technician in the District unless the person holds a valid registration issued by the Board and practices under the direct supervision of a person licensed to practice pharmacy under this chapter.

(b)

To be eligible for registration as a pharmacy technician, a person shall provide proof acceptable to the Board that he or she has:

(1)

A high school diploma or its equivalent, or has passed a Board- approved examination that proves that he or she has achieved competency in the educational skills required to perform the function of a pharmacy technician; and

(2)

(A)

A current certification from the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board, the National Healthcareer Association, or another national or state certifying organization approved by the Board; or

(B)

Successfully completed one of the following types of pharmacy training programs, which shall include a Board-approved exam:

(i)

A national, regional, or state accredited pharmacy technician training program recognized by the Board;

(ii)

A pharmacy technician program at a college or university that is accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the Secretary of the United States Department of Education or the Council on Postsecondary Accreditation;

(iii)

An employer-based pharmacy technician training program recognized by the Board that includes within a one-year period a minimum of 160 hours of training, including theoretical and practical instruction; or

(iv)

A pharmacy technician program that meets the guidelines of the American Society of Health-System Pharmacists, is licensed by the District of Columbia Educational Licensure Commission, and has certified to the Board its intent to pursue accreditation upon becoming eligible to do so.

(c)

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, for a period of one year after the effective date of rules issued pursuant to § 3-1207.58, a person who does not meet the requirements for registration under subsection (b) of this section shall be eligible for registration as a pharmacy technician if:

(1)

The person is at least 17 years of age;

(2)

The person submits proof, acceptable to the Board, that he or she has worked as a pharmacy technician for at least the 24 months immediately before May 1, 2013; and

(3)

A licensed pharmacist who has supervised the applicant for at least the 6 months immediately before the date the person applies for registration attests in writing that the person has competently performed the functions of a pharmacy technician.

(d)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, for a period of one year after the effective date of the rules issued pursuant to § 3-1207.58, a person who is not eligible for registration under subsection (b) or (c) of this section may engage in practice as a pharmacy technician if the person:

(1)

Has received training to competently and safely perform the tasks assigned; and

(2)

Engages in the practice as a pharmacy technician under the direct supervision of a pharmacist licensed under this chapter.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 752
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this section.
This section is referenced in § 3-1207.56.